Rhode Island statutes. Title 37 Public Property and Works
Chapter 6.1 Relocation Payments

37-6.1-1.
Approval of payments.

The director of the state department of transportation is hereby authorized to approve the payment by the general treasurer upon orders drawn by the state controller of relocation payments to eligible persons, businesses, farms, and nonprofit organizations of fair and reasonable relocation and other payments as provided by this chapter caused by their displacement from real property acquired by the state in conjunction with any federal or state highway program.

History of Section.

P.L. 1963, ch. 90, § 1; P.L. 1969, ch. 218, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 161.

37-6.1-2.
Administration of relocation assistance program.

In order to prevent unnecessary expenses and duplication of functions, the director of transportation may make relocation payments, or provide relocation assistance, or otherwise carry out the functions required under this chapter by utilizing the facilities, personnel, and services of any other federal, state, or local governmental agency having an established organization for conducting relocation assistance programs.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 218, § 1.

37-6.1-3.
Purposes for which payments made.

Payments for actual expenses. Upon application approved by the department of transportation, a person displaced by any state highway project may elect to receive actual reasonable expenses in moving him or herself, his or her family, his or her business, or his or her farm operation, including personal property, for a reasonable distance.

Optional payments — Dwellings. Any displaced person who moves from a dwelling who elects to accept the payments authorized by this subsection in lieu of the payments authorized by subsection (a) of this section may receive:

A moving expense allowance determined according to a schedule established by the director of transportation, not to exceed two hundred dollars ($200); and

A dislocation allowance of one hundred dollars ($100).

Optional payments — Business and farm operations. Any displaced person who moves or discontinues his or her business or farm operation who elects to accept the payment authorized by this subsection in lieu of the payment authorized by subsection (a) of this section, may receive a fixed relocation payment in an amount equal to the average annual net earnings of the business or farm operation, or five thousand dollars ($5,000), whichever is the lesser. In the case of a business, no payment shall be made under this subsection unless the director of transportation is satisfied that the business (i) cannot be relocated without a substantial loss of its existing patronage, and (ii) is not part of a commercial enterprise having at least one other establishment not being acquired by the state, which is engaged in the same or similar business. For purposes of this subsection, the term “average annual net earnings” means one half (1/2) of any net earnings of the business or farm operation, before taxes on income or gross receipts, during the two (2) taxable years immediately preceding the taxable year in which the business or farm operation moves from the real property acquired for the project, and includes any compensation paid by the business or farm operation to the owner, his or her spouse, or his or her dependents during the two (2) year period.

History of Section.

P.L. 1963, ch. 90, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

37-6.1-2

; P.L. 1969, ch. 218, § 1; P.L. 1970, ch. 297, § 1.

37-6.1-4.
Replacement housing.

In addition to amounts otherwise authorized by this chapter, the director of transportation shall make a payment to the owner of real property acquired for a project which is improved by a single, two (2), or three (3) family dwelling actually owned and occupied by the owner for not less than one year prior to the initiation of negotiations for the acquisition of the property. The payments, not to exceed amounts authorized by United States P.L. 91-646, [42 U.S.C. § 4601 et seq.], entitled Uniform Relocation Assistance and Land Acquisition Policies Act of 1970, and any subsequent amendments thereto, shall be the amount, if any, which, when added to the acquisition payment, equals the average price required for a comparable dwelling determined, in accordance with standards established by the director of transportation, to be a decent, safe, and sanitary dwelling adequate to accommodate the displaced owner, reasonably accessible to public services and places of employment, and available on the private market. The payment shall be made only to a displaced owner who purchases and occupies a dwelling within one year subsequent to the date on which he or she is required to move from the dwelling acquired for the project.

In addition to amounts otherwise authorized by this chapter, the director of transportation shall make a payment to any individual or family displaced from any dwelling not eligible to receive a payment under subsection (a) of this section, which dwelling was actually and lawfully occupied by the individual or family for not less than ninety (90) days prior to the initiation of negotiations for acquisition of the property, as is hereinafter specified. The payment, not to exceed amounts authorized by amounts allowable by United States P.L. 91-646, [42 U.S.C. § 4601, et seq.], entitled Uniform Relocation Assistance and Land Acquisition Policies Act of 1970, and any subsequent amendments thereto shall be the increased differential in amount, if any, over the rental value or the acquisition price of the dwelling previously occupied, which is necessary to enable the person to lease or rent for a period not to exceed two (2) years, or to make the down payment on the purchase of a decent, safe, and sanitary dwelling of standards adequate to accommodate the individual or family in areas not generally less desirable in regard to public utilities and public and commercial facilities, the differential amount to be computed according to an equitable schedule or formula established by the director of transportation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 218, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 169, § 1.

37-6.1-5.
Expenses incidental to transfer of property.

In addition to amounts otherwise authorized by this chapter, the director of transportation shall reimburse the owner of real property acquired for a project for reasonable and necessary expenses incurred for:

Recording fees, transfer taxes, and similar expenses incidental to conveying the property;

Penalty costs for repayment of any mortgage entered into in good faith encumbering the real property if the mortgage is on record or has been filed for record on the date of acquisition by the state of the real estate; and

The pro rata portion of real property taxes paid which are allocable to a period subsequent to the date of vesting of title in the state, or the effective date of the possession of the real property by the state, whichever is earlier.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 218, § 1.

37-6.1-6.
Effect on eminent domain proceedings.

The payments authorized in this chapter shall not be construed as creating in any condemnation proceeding brought under the power of eminent domain any element of damages not in existence on August 23, 1968, and the payments are to be in addition to the just compensation established in condemnation proceedings but only to the extent that they are not otherwise included within the condemnation award.

In any condemnation proceedings where the director of transportation has, previous to an award made by the court, made available to the displaced person a portion of the fair market value of the acquired property, the payment authorized in subsection (a) of §

37-6.1-4

may be altered to reflect any change in the fair market value as may thereafter be established in the condemnation proceedings by the court. In any case where the director of transportation had made an advance payment and the amount payable under subsection (a) of §

37-6.1-4

is reduced by virtue of the determination of a higher fair market value by the court in the condemnation proceedings, the director of transportation may set off in the condemnation proceeding the amount by which the payment should be reduced against any additional sums payable to the displaced person under the terms of the award in the condemnation proceeding.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 218, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 492, § 9.

37-6.1-7.
Relocation services.

The department of transportation shall provide a relocation advisory assistance program which shall include such measures, facilities, or services as may be necessary or appropriate in order:

To determine the needs, if any, of displaced families, individuals, business concerns, and farm operators for relocation assistance;

To assure that, within a reasonable period of time, prior to displacement, there will be available, to the extent that can reasonably be accomplished, in areas not generally less desirable in regard to public utilities and public and commercial facilities and at rents or prices within the financial means of the families and individuals displaced, housing meeting the standards established by the director of transportation for decent, safe, and sanitary dwellings, equal in number to the number of, and available to, the displaced families and individuals and reasonably accessible to their places of employment;

To assist owners of displaced businesses and displaced farm operators in obtaining and becoming established in suitable locations; and

To supply information concerning the federal housing administration home acquisition program under § 221(d)(2) of the National Housing Act 12 U.S.C. § 1715(d)(2), the small business disaster loan program under § 7(b)(3) of the Small Business Act 15 U.S.C. § 636(b)(3), and other state or federal programs offering assistance to displaced persons.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 218, § 1.

37-6.1-8.
Rules and regulations.

To carry into effect the provisions of this chapter, the director of transportation is authorized to make such rules and regulations as he or she may determine to be necessary to assure:

That the payments authorized by this chapter shall be fair, reasonable, and as uniform as practicable;

That a displaced person who makes proper application for a payment authorized for a person by this chapter shall be paid promptly after a move or, in hardship cases, may be paid in advance; and

That any person aggrieved by a determination as to eligibility for a payment authorized by this chapter, or the amount of a payment, may have his or her application reviewed by the director of transportation or his or her designated representative.

The director of transportation may make such other rules and regulations consistent with the provisions of this chapter as he or she deems necessary or appropriate to carry out this chapter.

The director of transportation, in order to achieve a uniform administration of related federal and state laws, may adopt all or any part of applicable federal rules and regulations relating to the subject matter of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 218, § 1.

37-6.1-8.1.
Compliance with federal law.

The state of Rhode Island and any and all of its agencies and departments are hereby authorized to comply fully with the pertinent provisions of the Uniform Relocation Assistance and Land Acquisition Policies Act of 1970, 42 U.S.C. § 4601 et seq., and any subsequent amendments thereto, by making all of the payments authorized and set forth in the federal act and by providing any and all of the services as set forth in the federal act.

History of Section.

P.L. 1971, ch. 19, § 1.

37-6.1-9.
Definitions.

As used in the preceding sections of this chapter the following terms shall have the following meanings:

“Business” means any lawful activity conducted primarily:

For the purchase and resale, manufacture, processing, or marketing of products, commodities, or any other personal property;

For the sale of services to the public; or

By a nonprofit organization.

“Displaced person” means any person who moves from real property on or after August 23, 1968, as a result of the acquisition or reasonable expectation of acquisition of real property, which is subsequently acquired in whole or in part by the state for a highway, or as the result of the acquisition by the state for a highway of other real property on which the person conducts a business or farm operation. A person who moves from real property which is subsequently acquired for a state highway as a result of the “reasonable expectation of acquisition of the real property” is one who moves from the property (i) after notification by the department of transportation that the property is to be acquired for a project or after the location of the highway has been definitely established and approved by the department of transportation and (ii) within twelve (12) months before the property is scheduled to be taken by the state; provided that a person who moves onto real property within twelve (12) months before the property is scheduled to be taken by the state and moves from the property more than ninety (90) days before the property is scheduled to be taken by the state is not a displaced person for the purposes of this chapter. Any person who moves from the property prior to acquisition thereof by the state, in order to be eligible for payment under this chapter shall, prior to the removal, notify the department of transportation in writing thereof and receive the certificate of the department of transportation as to his or her eligibility as a displaced person for the purposes of this chapter subject to the subsequent acquisition of the property by the state.

“Family” means two (2) or more individuals living together in the same dwelling unit who are related to each other by blood, marriage, adoption, or legal guardianship.

“Farm operation” means any activity conducted solely or primarily for the production of one or more agricultural products or commodities for sale and home use, and customarily producing those products or commodities in sufficient quantity to be capable of contributing materially to the operator’s support.

“Person” means:

Any individual, partnership, corporation, or association which is the owner of a business;

Any owner, part owner, tenant, or sharecropper who operates a farm;

An individual who is the head of a family; or

An individual not a member of a family.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 218, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 161.

37-6.1-10.
Reservoir program — Relocation payments.

The water resources board is hereby authorized to approve the payment by the general treasurer upon orders drawn by the state controller of relocation payments to eligible owner and nonowner persons, families, business concerns, and nonprofit organizations for their reasonable and necessary moving expenses caused by their displacement from real property acquired by the state in conjunction with any federal or state reservoir program.

History of Section.

P.L. 1966, ch. 279, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

37-6.1-5

; P.L. 1969, ch. 218, § 1.

37-6.1-11.
Reservoir program — Rules and regulations for relocation payments — Maximum payments.

Payments under §

37-6.1-10

shall be subject to such rules and regulations as may be prescribed by the water resources board and shall not exceed two hundred dollars ($200) in the case of an individual or family, or three thousand dollars ($3,000) in the case of a business concern (including the operation of a farm) or nonprofit organization. In the case of a business (including the operation of a farm) and in the case of a non-profit organization, the allowable expenses for transportation under this section shall not exceed the cost of moving fifty (50) miles from the point from which the business or organization is being displaced. The rules and regulations may include provisions authorizing relocation payments to be made to individuals and families of fixed amounts (not to exceed two hundred dollars ($200) in any case) in lieu of their respective, reasonable, and necessary moving expenses.

History of Section.

P.L. 1966, ch. 279, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

37-6.1-6

; P.L. 1969, ch. 218, § 1.

37-6.1-12.
Severability.

The provisions of this chapter are severable and if any of its provisions are adjudged to be invalid or unconstitutional, this shall not affect or impair any of the remaining provisions.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 218, § 2.